Tennessee, session 114, SB0818.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 65, Chapter 15, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) An individual seeking to work as a transportation network driver in this state
shall first obtain a transportation network license from the department of commerce and
insurance.
(b)
SB0818
002376
- 1 -

(1) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2), in order to be issued a
transportation network license from the department, the individual must have a
valid Tennessee driver license.
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(1), a resident of Desoto County,
Mississippi, or Crittenden County, Arkansas, may be issued a transportation
network license from the department upon providing proof of residency of such
county.
(c) A driver's transportation network license is valid for a period of one (1) year.
The department shall establish a means by which a driver may renew a license through
the department's website. The department shall also promulgate rules, in accordance
with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, by which
the department may suspend or revoke a driver's transportation network license upon
the driver committing a serious traffic violation or criminal offense or upon good cause
shown.
(d) An individual without a valid transportation network license is prohibited from
accepting or transporting a prearranged ride originating in this state. This subsection (d)
does not prohibit a prearranged ride originating in another state from ending in this state.
(e) A transportation network company shall not authorize a driver without a valid
transportation network license to accept or transport a prearranged ride originating in
this state.
(f) A transportation network company that violates subsection (e) is subject to a
civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation. If a transportation is found by
the commissioner of commerce and insurance to have multiple violations of subsection
(e) in a manner that is deemed to constitute willful or wanton disregard of the
- 2 - 002376

requirements of this section, then the commissioner shall take action to suspend or
revoke the transportation network company's ability to operate in this state.
SECTION 2. The department of commerce and insurance is authorized to promulgate
rules to effectuate this act. The rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform
Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 5.
SECTION 3. For purposes of promulgating rules, this act takes effect upon becoming a
law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, this act takes effect January 1, 2026,
the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 002376